Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.906

Pickett House—In trust—Reverter.

Said chapter, by acceptance of such conveyance, shall be deemed to have agreed to hold said property in trust for the state of Washington, and to maintain and keep the same open to the public as an historical site, and, in case of its failure so to do, title to said property shall revert to the state of Washington.

[ 1965 c 31 s 2. Formerly RCW 27.28.022.]